District of Columbia statutes.
29-939

Taxation; annual license fee.

Associations formed under this chapter, and foreign corporations and associations admitted under § 29-936 to do business in the District, shall pay an annual license fee established by the Mayor by rule.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-944.
1981 Ed., § 29-1144.
1973 Ed., § 29-844.